Florida, session 2026, HB437.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
56
57 Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 119.011, Florida
58 Statutes, is amended to read:
59 119.011 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
60 (1) "Actual cost of duplication" means the cost of the
61 material and supplies used to duplicate the public record. The
62 term includes the cost of agency resources, including the cost
63 of clerical and supervisory assistance and costs incurred for
64 the use of agency information technology associated with such
65 duplication which are incurred by the agency in complying with a
66 request for public records. The cost of clerical or supervisory
67 assistance may not be greater than the base hourly rate of the
68 lowest paid personnel capable of providing such clerical or
69 supervisory assistance. The term does not include overhead costs
70 associated with duplication of a public record, but does not
71 include labor cost or overhead cost associated with such
72 duplication.
Page 3 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
73 Section 2. Paragraphs (c), (f), and (g) of subsection (1),
74 paragraph (c) of subsection (2), paragraph (d) of subsection
75 (3), and subsection (4) of section 119.07, Florida Statutes, are
76 amended to read:
77 119.07 Inspection and copying of records; photographing
78 public records; fees; exemptions.—
79 (1)
80 (c)1. A custodian of public records and his or her
81 designee must acknowledge requests to inspect or copy records
82 promptly and respond to such requests in good faith. A good
83 faith response includes making reasonable efforts to determine
84 from other officers or employees within the agency whether such
85 a record exists and, if so, the location at which the record can
86 be accessed. Failure to acknowledge a public records request
87 promptly and respond to such request in good faith is a
88 violation of this chapter.
89 2.a. No later than 3 business days after receiving a
90 public records request, a custodian of public records must:
91 (I) Provide the requested records;
92 (II) Provide the requester a good faith estimate of a
93 reasonable amount of time in which the custodian will provide
94 the records and a good faith estimate of any costs that will be
95 assessed for complying with the request; or
96 (III) To the extent any records request, or any portion
Page 4 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
97 thereof, is denied, deny the request, in whole or in part, and
98 cite the statutory exemption authorizing the denial as provided
99 in paragraphs (e) and (f).
100 b. If the custodian of public records fails to take any of
101 the actions described in sub-subparagraph a. within 3 business
102 days after receiving the public records request, the agency may
103 not impose costs or fees for providing the requested public
104 record.
105 c. Notwithstanding sub-subparagraph a., there is no
106 presumption in any civil action brought to enforce a requester's
107 right to inspect or copy public records that a request was not
108 unlawfully delayed because an agency complied with sub-
109 subparagraph a.
110 (f) If requested by the person seeking to inspect or copy
111 the record, the custodian of public records shall state in
112 writing and with particularity:
113 1. The reasons for taking more than 15 days to provide the
114 requested record; or
115 2. The reasons for the conclusion that the record is
116 exempt or confidential, including all statutory citations relied
117 upon in determining that the record is exempt or confidential.
118 (g)1. In any civil action in which an exemption to this
119 section is asserted, if the exemption is alleged to exist under
120 or by virtue of s. 119.071(1)(d) or (f), (2)(d), (e), or (f), or
Page 5 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
121 (4)(c), the public record or part thereof in question shall be
122 submitted to the court for an inspection in camera. If an
123 exemption is alleged to exist under or by virtue of s.
124 119.071(2)(c), an inspection in camera is discretionary with the
125 court. If the court finds that the asserted exemption is not
126 applicable, it shall order the public record or part thereof in
127 question to be immediately produced for inspection or copying as
128 requested by the person seeking such access.
129 2. In any civil action brought by a requester to enforce
130 the right to public records, an agency may not assert any
131 exemption or justification for not providing the public records
132 requested which it has not previously raised in a written
133 response to the requester before the civil action was filed to
134 justify the agency's nondisclosure or delay in providing the
135 public records requested.
136 3. In any civil action brought by a requester alleging
137 that an agency unlawfully delayed providing public records, a
138 public records request backlog or other unfulfilled public
139 records requests to the agency is not deemed a justification, in
140 whole or in part, for the alleged delay.
141 (2)
142 (c) Unless otherwise required by law, the custodian of
143 public records may charge a fee for remote electronic access,
144 granted under a contractual arrangement with a user, which fee
Page 6 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
145 may include the direct and indirect costs of providing such
146 access. Fees for remote electronic access provided to the
147 general public shall be in accordance with the provisions of
148 this section.
149 (3)
150 (d) Photographing of public records shall be done in the
151 room where the public records are kept. If, in the judgment of
152 the custodian of public records, this is impossible or
153 impracticable, photographing shall be done in another room or
154 place, as nearly adjacent as possible to the room where the
155 public records are kept, to be determined by the custodian of
156 public records. Where provision of another room or place for
157 photographing is required, the expense of providing the same
158 shall be paid by the person desiring to photograph the public
159 record pursuant to paragraph (4)(h) (4)(e).
160 (4) The custodian of public records shall furnish a copy
161 or a certified copy of the record upon payment of the fee
162 prescribed by law.
163 (a) If a fee is not prescribed by law, the following fees
164 are authorized:
165 (a)
166 1. Up to 15 cents per one-sided copy for duplicated copies
167 of not more than 14 inches by 8 1/2 inches;
168 2. No more than an additional 5 cents for each two-sided
Page 7 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
169 copy; and
170 3. For all other copies, the actual cost of duplication of
171 the public record.
172
173 If the nature or volume of the public records requested to be
174 inspected or copied is such that they require less than 30
175 minutes to prepare, the agency may not charge the actual cost of
176 duplication or any other costs or fees to the requester.
177 (b)1. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "any
178 electronic medium stored, maintained, or used by an agency"
179 means any electronic format that the agency can reasonably
180 provide as part of the standard operation of its electronic
181 recordkeeping system. If an agency is able to convert the record
182 into the electronic format requested as a step in the process of
183 copying or exporting the requested record, the agency must
184 provide the record in the format requested and may charge a fee
185 authorized by this subsection.
186 2. For a copy of a public record in any electronic medium
187 stored, maintained, or used by an agency, the actual cost of
188 duplication. However, if the nature or volume of the public
189 records requested to be duplicated is such that such duplication
190 requires less than 30 minutes, the agency may not charge the
191 actual cost of duplication or any other costs or fees to the
192 requester.
Page 8 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
193 3. An agency may not charge a requester the actual cost of
194 duplication or any other cost or fee for providing any public
195 record that has been previously disclosed under another public
196 records request made to that agency.
197 (c)(b) The charge for copies of county maps or aerial
198 photographs supplied by county constitutional officers may also
199 include a reasonable charge for the labor and overhead
200 associated with their duplication.
201 (d)(c) An agency may charge up to $1 per copy for a
202 certified copy of a public record.
203 (e) All fees authorized under this subsection may be
204 reduced or waived in full, or in part, for a public purpose,
205 including public agency program support, nonprofit activities,
206 journalistic activities, and academic or other research. For a
207 public records request meeting the public purposes provided in
208 this paragraph, an agency may not charge the requester any cost
209 or fee for the first 10 hours of time the agency estimates it
210 would take to comply with the request.
211 (f) If requested by the person seeking to inspect or copy
212 the record, the custodian of public records must provide the
213 person a written, detailed estimate of all costs associated with
214 the request sufficient to permit the person to assess the
215 lawfulness of the estimate.
216 (g) An agency may not charge a fee for costs associated
Page 9 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
217 with review and redaction of exempt or confidential and exempt
218 information from a public record that has been requested to be
219 inspected or copied.
220 (d) If the nature or volume of public records requested to
221 be inspected or copied pursuant to this subsection is such as to
222 require extensive use of information technology resources or
223 extensive clerical or supervisory assistance by personnel of the
224 agency involved, or both, the agency may charge, in addition to
225 the actual cost of duplication, a special service charge, which
226 shall be reasonable and shall be based on the cost incurred for
227 such extensive use of information technology resources or the
228 labor cost of the personnel providing the service that is
229 actually incurred by the agency or attributable to the agency
230 for the clerical and supervisory assistance required, or both.
231 (h)(e)1. When Where provision of another room or place is
232 necessary to photograph public records, the expense of providing
233 the same must shall be paid by the person desiring to photograph
234 the public records.
235 2. The custodian of public records may charge the person
236 making the photographs for supervision services at a rate of
237 compensation to be agreed upon by the person desiring to make
238 the photographs and the custodian of public records. If they
239 fail to agree as to the appropriate charge, the charge shall be
240 determined by the custodian of public records.
Page 10 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
241 Section 3. Section 119.10, Florida Statutes, is amended to
242 read:
243 (Substantial rewording of section. See
244 s. 119.10, F.S., for present text.)
245 119.10 Violation of chapter; penalties.—
246 (1) A violation of any law that provides access to public
247 records, including those laws that limit public access to such
248 records, is a violation of this chapter.
249 (2) A person who violates this section commits a
250 noncriminal infraction, punishable by a fine not to exceed $500.
251 (3) A person who willfully and knowingly violates this
252 chapter commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as
253 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
254 (4) A person outside this state who knowingly violates
255 this chapter commits a misdemeanor of the first degree,
256 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
257 (5) A court must assess a penalty against the agency
258 payable to the requester in an amount equal to twice the amount
259 awarded pursuant to s. 119.12, in addition to a penalty of $200
260 for each day the agency unlawfully denied the right to inspect
261 or copy the public records, if the court determines that an
262 agency has:
263 (a) Violated s. 119.07(1); and
264 (b) Shown intentional disregard for the public's
Page 11 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
265 constitutional right of access under s. 24(a), Art. I of the
266 State Constitution; or
267 (c) Engaged in a pattern or practice of abuse of the
268 requirements of this chapter.
269 Section 4. Section 119.12, Florida Statutes, is amended to
270 read:
271 119.12 Attorney fees.—
272 (1) The court must assess and award against the agency
273 responsible the reasonable costs of enforcement, including
274 reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred in litigation, if:
275 (a) A civil action is filed against an agency to seek
276 access to records under enforce the provisions of this chapter
277 or any other law that relates to access to public records.
278 (b) The court determines that such agency violated such
279 law.
280 (2) Fees assessed pursuant to this section may not be
281 assessed against a person acting on the advice of an agency
282 attorney but must be assessed against the agency., the court
283 shall assess and award the reasonable costs of enforcement,
284 including reasonable attorney fees, against the responsible
285 agency if the court determines that:
286 (a) The agency unlawfully refused to permit a public
287 record to be inspected or copied; and
288 (b) The complainant provided written notice identifying
Page 12 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
289 the public record request to the agency's custodian of public
290 records at least 5 business days before filing the civil action,
291 except as provided under subsection (2). The notice period
292 begins on the day the written notice of the request is received
293 by the custodian of public records, excluding Saturday, Sunday,
294 and legal holidays, and runs until 5 business days have elapsed.
295 (2) The complainant is not required to provide written
296 notice of the public record request to the agency's custodian of
297 public records as provided in paragraph (1)(b) if the agency
298 does not prominently post the contact information for the
299 agency's custodian of public records in the agency's primary
300 administrative building in which public records are routinely
301 created, sent, received, maintained, and requested and on the
302 agency's website, if the agency has a website.
303 (3) The court shall determine whether the complainant
304 requested to inspect or copy a public record or participated in
305 the civil action for an improper purpose. If the court
306 determines there was an improper purpose, the court may not
307 assess and award the reasonable costs of enforcement, including
308 reasonable attorney fees, to the complainant, and shall assess
309 and award against the complainant and to the agency the
310 reasonable costs, including reasonable attorney fees, incurred
311 by the agency in responding to the civil action. For purposes of
312 this subsection, the term "improper purpose" means a request to
Page 13 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
313 inspect or copy a public record or to participate in the civil
314 action primarily to cause a violation of this chapter or for a
315 frivolous purpose.
316 (4) This section does not create a private right of action
317 authorizing the award of monetary damages for a person who
318 brings an action to enforce the provisions of this chapter.
319 Payments by the responsible agency may include only the
320 reasonable costs of enforcement, including reasonable attorney
321 fees, directly attributable to a civil action brought to enforce
322 the provisions of this chapter.
323 (5) If a person is charged with a violation of this
324 chapter and is subsequently acquitted, the agency may reimburse
325 the person for any portion of his or her reasonable attorney
326 fees.
327 Section 5. Subsections (3) and (4) of section 119.15,
328 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
329 119.15 Legislative review of exemptions from public
330 meeting and public records requirements.—
331 (3)(a) In the 5th year after enactment of a new exemption
332 or substantial amendment of an existing exemption, the exemption
333 shall be repealed on October 2 2nd of the 5th year, unless the
334 Legislature acts to reenact the exemption.
335 (b) In the 10th year after reenactment, the exemption must
336 be repealed on October 2 of the 10th year, unless the
Page 14 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
337 Legislature acts to reenact the exemption.
338 (4)(a) A law that enacts a new exemption or substantially
339 amends an existing exemption must state that the record or
340 meeting is:
341 1. Exempt from s. 24, Art. I of the State Constitution;
342 2. Exempt from s. 119.07(1) or s. 286.011; and
343 3. Repealed at the end of 5 years and that the exemption
344 must be reviewed by the Legislature before the scheduled repeal
345 date, and every 10 years thereafter.
346 (b) For purposes of this section, an exemption is
347 substantially amended if the amendment expands the scope of the
348 exemption to include more records or information or to include
349 meetings as well as records. An exemption is not substantially
350 amended if the amendment narrows the scope of the exemption.
351 (c) This section is not intended to repeal an exemption
352 that has been amended following legislative review before the
353 scheduled repeal of the exemption if the exemption is not
354 substantially amended as a result of the review.
355 Section 6. Section 282.711, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
356 Section 7. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
357 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
358 921.0022 Criminal Punishment Code; offense severity
359 ranking chart.—
360 (3) OFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART
Page 15 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
361 (c) LEVEL 3
362
Florida Felony
Statute Degree Description
363
119.10(2)(b) 3rd Unlawful use of confidential
information from police
reports.
364
316.066 3rd Unlawfully obtaining or using
(3)(b)-(d) confidential crash reports.
365
316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 3rd conviction.
366
316.1935(2) 3rd Fleeing or attempting to elude
law enforcement officer in
patrol vehicle with siren and
lights activated.
367
319.30(4) 3rd Possession by junkyard of motor
vehicle with identification
number plate removed.
368
319.33(1)(a) 3rd Alter or forge any certificate
Page 16 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
of title to a motor vehicle or
mobile home.
369
319.33(1)(c) 3rd Procure or pass title on stolen
vehicle.
370
319.33(4) 3rd With intent to defraud,
possess, sell, etc., a blank,
forged, or unlawfully obtained
title or registration.
371
327.35(2)(b) 3rd Felony BUI.
372
328.05(2) 3rd Possess, sell, or counterfeit
fictitious, stolen, or
fraudulent titles or bills of
sale of vessels.
373
328.07(4) 3rd Manufacture, exchange, or
possess vessel with counterfeit
or wrong ID number.
374
376.302(5) 3rd Fraud related to reimbursement
for cleanup expenses under the
Page 17 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
Inland Protection Trust Fund.
375
379.2431 3rd Taking, disturbing, mutilating,
(1)(e)5. destroying, causing to be
destroyed, transferring,
selling, offering to sell,
molesting, or harassing marine
turtles, marine turtle eggs, or
marine turtle nests in
violation of the Marine Turtle
Protection Act.
376
379.2431 3rd Possessing any marine turtle
(1)(e)6. species or hatchling, or parts
thereof, or the nest of any
marine turtle species described
in the Marine Turtle Protection
Act.
377
379.2431 3rd Soliciting to commit or
(1)(e)7. conspiring to commit a
violation of the Marine Turtle
Protection Act.
378
Page 18 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
400.9935(4)(a) 3rd Operating a clinic, or offering
or (b) services requiring licensure,
without a license.
379
400.9935(4)(e) 3rd Filing a false license
application or other required
information or failing to
report information.
380
440.1051(3) 3rd False report of workers'
compensation fraud or
retaliation for making such a
report.
381
501.001(2)(b) 2nd Tampers with a consumer product
or the container using
materially false/misleading
information.
382
624.401(4)(a) 3rd Transacting insurance without a
certificate of authority.
383
624.401(4)(b)1. 3rd Transacting insurance without a
certificate of authority;
Page 19 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
premium collected less than
$20,000.
384
626.902(1)(a) & 3rd Representing an unauthorized
(b) insurer.
385
697.08 3rd Equity skimming.
386
790.15(3) 3rd Person directs another to
discharge firearm from a
vehicle.
387
794.053 3rd Lewd or lascivious written
solicitation of a person 16 or
17 years of age by a person 24
years of age or older.
388
800.045(3) 3rd Possess, control, or
intentionally view any
photographic material, motion
picture, etc., which includes a
lewd or lascivious image.
389
806.10(1) 3rd Maliciously injure, destroy, or
Page 20 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
interfere with vehicles or
equipment used in firefighting.
390
806.10(2) 3rd Interferes with or assaults
firefighter in performance of
duty.
391
810.09(2)(b) 3rd Trespass on property other than
structure or conveyance armed
with firearm or dangerous
weapon.
392
810.145(2)(c) 3rd Digital voyeurism; 19 years of
age or older.
393
812.014(2)(c)2. 3rd Grand theft; $5,000 or more but
less than $10,000.
394
812.0145(2)(c) 3rd Theft from person 65 years of
age or older; $300 or more but
less than $10,000.
395
812.015(8)(b) 3rd Retail theft with intent to
sell; conspires with others.
Page 21 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
396
812.081(2) 3rd Theft of a trade secret.
397
815.04(4)(b) 2nd Computer offense devised to
defraud or obtain property.
398
817.034(4)(a)3. 3rd Engages in scheme to defraud
(Florida Communications Fraud
Act), property valued at less
than $20,000.
399
817.233 3rd Burning to defraud insurer.
400
817.234 3rd Unlawful solicitation of
(8)(b) & (c) persons involved in motor
vehicle accidents.
401
817.234(11)(a) 3rd Insurance fraud; property value
less than $20,000.
402
817.236 3rd Filing a false motor vehicle
insurance application.
403
817.2361 3rd Creating, marketing, or
Page 22 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
presenting a false or
fraudulent motor vehicle
insurance card.
404
817.413(2) 3rd Sale of used goods of $1,000 or
more as new.
405
817.49(2)(b)1. 3rd Willful making of a false
report of a crime causing great
bodily harm, permanent
disfigurement, or permanent
disability.
406
831.28(2)(a) 3rd Counterfeiting a payment
instrument with intent to
defraud or possessing a
counterfeit payment instrument
with intent to defraud.
407
831.29 2nd Possession of instruments for
counterfeiting driver licenses
or identification cards.
408
836.13(2) 3rd Generating an altered sexual
Page 23 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
depiction of an identifiable
person without consent.
409
836.13(4) 3rd Promoting, or possessing with
intent to promote, an altered
sexual depiction of an
identifiable person without
consent.
410
838.021(3)(b) 3rd Threatens unlawful harm to
public servant.
411
847.01385 3rd Harmful communication to a
minor.
412
860.15(3) 3rd Overcharging for repairs and
parts.
413
870.01(2) 3rd Riot.
414
870.01(4) 3rd Inciting a riot.
415
893.13(1)(a)2. 3rd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
cannabis (or other s.
Page 24 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs).
416
893.13(1)(d)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs
within 1,000 feet of
university.
417
893.13(1)(f)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver
s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1.,
(2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6.,
(2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9.,
(2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs
within 1,000 feet of public
housing facility.
418
893.13(4)(c) 3rd Use or hire of minor; deliver
to minor other controlled
substances.
Page 25 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
419
893.13(6)(a) 3rd Possession of any controlled
substance other than felony
possession of cannabis.
420
893.13(7)(a)8. 3rd Withhold information from
practitioner regarding previous
receipt of or prescription for
a controlled substance.
421
893.13(7)(a)9. 3rd Obtain or attempt to obtain
controlled substance by fraud,
forgery, misrepresentation,
etc.
422
893.13(7)(a)10. 3rd Affix false or forged label to
package of controlled
substance.
423
893.13(7)(a)11. 3rd Furnish false or fraudulent
material information on any
document or record required by
chapter 893.
424
Page 26 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
893.13(8)(a)1. 3rd Knowingly assist a patient,
other person, or owner of an
animal in obtaining a
controlled substance through
deceptive, untrue, or
fraudulent representations in
or related to the
practitioner's practice.
425
893.13(8)(a)2. 3rd Employ a trick or scheme in the
practitioner's practice to
assist a patient, other person,
or owner of an animal in
obtaining a controlled
substance.
426
893.13(8)(a)3. 3rd Knowingly write a prescription
for a controlled substance for
a fictitious person.
427
893.13(8)(a)4. 3rd Write a prescription for a
controlled substance for a
patient, other person, or an
animal if the sole purpose of
Page 27 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 437 2026
writing the prescription is a
monetary benefit for the
practitioner.
428
918.13(1) 3rd Tampering with or fabricating
physical evidence.
429
944.47 3rd Introduce contraband to
(1)(a)1. & 2. correctional facility.
430
944.47(1)(c) 2nd Possess contraband while upon
the grounds of a correctional
institution.
431
985.721 3rd Escapes from a juvenile
facility (secure detention or
residential commitment
facility).
432
433 Section 8. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 28 of 28
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb437-00